Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1260.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 13.1, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 162, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 13.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 13.1. Persons convicted of:
1. First degree murder as provided for in Section 701.7 of this
title;
2. Second degree murder as provided for in Section 701.8 of
this title;
3. Manslaughter in the first degree as provided for in Section
711 of this title;
4. Poisoning with intent to kill as provided for in Section 651
of this title;
5. Shooting with intent to kill, use of a vehicle to facilitate
use of a firearm, crossbow, or other weapon, assault, battery, or
assault and battery with a deadly weapon or by other means likely to
produce death or great bodily harm, as provided for in Sections 644
and 652 of this title;
6. Assault with intent to kill as provided for in Section 653
of this title;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1260 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

7. Conjoint robbery as provided for in Section 800 of this
title;
8. Robbery with a dangerous weapon as provided for in Section
801 of this title;
9. First degree robbery as provided for in Section 797 of this
title;
10. First degree rape as provided for in Section 1111 or 1114
of this title;
11. First degree arson as provided for in Section 1401 of this
title;
12. First degree burglary as provided for in Section 1431 of
this title;
13. Bombing as provided for in Section 1767.1 of this title;
14. Any crime against a child as provided for in Section 843.5
of this title;
15. Forcible sodomy as provided for in Section 888 of this
title;
16. Child sexual abuse material or aggravated child sexual
abuse material as provided for in Section 1021.2, 1021.3, 1024.1,
1024.2, or 1040.12a of this title;
17. Child sex trafficking as defined in Section 1030 of this
title;
18. Lewd molestation of a child as provided for in Section 1123
of this title;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1260 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

19. 18. Abuse of a vulnerable adult as defined in Section 10-
103 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
20. 19. Aggravated trafficking as provided for in subsection C
of Section 2-415 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
21. 20. Aggravated assault and battery, as provided for in
Section 646 of this title, upon any person defending another person
from assault and battery; or
22. Human trafficking as defined in Section 748 of this title,
21. Discharging a firearm at or into a dwelling or building
used for public or business purposes, as provided for in Section
1289.17A of this title,
or any attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation thereof, shall be
required to serve not less than eighty-five percent (85%) of any
sentence of imprisonment imposed by the judicial system prior to
becoming eligible for consideration for parole. Persons convicted
of these offenses shall not be eligible for earned credits or any
other type of credits which have the effect of reducing the length
of the sentence to less than eighty-five percent (85%) of the
sentence imposed.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 748, as last
amended by Section 20, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 748), is amended to read as follows:
Section 748. A. As used in Sections 748 this section and
Section 748.2 of this title:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1260 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. “Coercion” means compelling, forcing, or intimidating a
person to act by:
a. threats of harm or physical restraint against any
person,
b. any act, scheme, plan, or pattern intended to cause a
person to believe that performing, or failing to
perform, an act would result in serious physical,
financial, or emotional harm or distress to or
physical restraint against any person,
c. the abuse or threatened abuse of the law or legal
process,
d. knowingly destroying, concealing, removing,
confiscating, or possessing any actual or purported
passport, labor or immigration document, or other
government identification document, including, but not
limited to, a driver license or birth certificate, of
another person,
e. facilitating or controlling a person’s access to any
addictive or controlled substance other than for legal
medical purposes,
f. blackmail,
g. demanding or claiming money, goods, or any other thing
of value from or on behalf of a prostituted person

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1260 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

where such demand or claim arises from or is directly
related to the act of prostitution,
h. determining, dictating, or setting the times at which
another person will be available to engage in an act
of prostitution with a third party,
i. determining, dictating, or setting the places at which
another person will be available for solicitation of,
or to engage in, an act of prostitution with a third
party, or
j. determining, dictating, or setting the places at which
another person will reside for purposes of making such
person available to engage in an act of prostitution
with a third party;
2. “Commercial sex” means any form of commercial sexual
activity such as sexually explicit performances, prostitution,
participation in the production of pornography, performance in a
strip club, or exotic dancing or display;
3. “Debt bondage” means the status or condition of a debtor
arising from a pledge by the debtor of his or her personal services
or of those of a person under his or her control as a security for
debt if the value of those services as reasonably assessed is not
applied toward the liquidation of the debt or the length and nature
of those services are not respectively limited and defined;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1260 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

4. “Human trafficking” means modern-day slavery that includes,
but is not limited to, extreme exploitation and the denial of
freedom or liberty of an individual for purposes of deriving benefit
from that individual’s commercial sex act or labor;
5. “Human trafficking for labor” means:
a. recruiting, enticing, harboring, maintaining,
transporting, providing, or obtaining, by any means,
another person through deception, force, fraud, threat
or coercion or for purposes of engaging the person in
labor, or
b. benefiting, financially or by receiving anything of
value, from participation in a venture that has
engaged in an act of trafficking for labor;
6. “Human trafficking for commercial sex” means:
a. recruiting, enticing, harboring, maintaining,
transporting, providing, or obtaining, by any means,
another person through deception, force, fraud,
threat, or coercion for purposes of engaging the
person in a commercial sex act,
b. recruiting, enticing, harboring, maintaining,
transporting, providing, purchasing, or obtaining, by
any means, a minor for purposes of engaging the minor
in a commercial sex act, or

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1260 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

c. benefiting, financially or by receiving anything of
value, from participating in a venture that has
engaged in an act of trafficking for commercial sex;
7. “Legal process” means the criminal law, the civil law, or
the regulatory system of the federal government, any state,
territory, district, commonwealth, or trust territory therein, and
any foreign government or subdivision thereof and includes legal
civil actions, criminal actions, and regulatory petitions or
applications;
8. “Minor” means an individual under eighteen (18) years of
age; and
9. “Victim” means a person against whom a violation of any
provision of this section has been committed.
B. It shall be unlawful to knowingly engage in human
trafficking.
C. 1. Any person violating the provisions of this section
shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class A2 felony offense
punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of
Corrections for a term of not less than five (5) years or for life,
or by a fine of not more than One Hundred Thousand Dollars
($100,000.00), or by both such fine imprisonment and imprisonment
fine.
2. Any person violating the provisions of this section where
the victim of the offense is under eighteen (18) years of age at the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1260 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

time of the offense shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class A2
felony offense punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the
Department of Corrections for a term of not less than fifteen (15)
ten (10) years or, for life, or for life without parole, or by a
fine of not more than Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars
($250,000.00), or by both such fine imprisonment and imprisonment
fine.
3. The court shall also order the defendant to pay restitution
to the victim as provided in Section 991f of Title 22 of the
Oklahoma Statutes. In addition, the court shall require the
defendant to pay for a psychological evaluation to determine the
extent of counseling necessary for the human trafficking victim and
any necessary psychological counseling deemed necessary to
rehabilitate the victim. Such evaluations and counseling may be
performed by psychiatrists, psychologists, licensed professional
counselors, or social workers.
4. If the person is convicted of human trafficking, the person
shall serve eighty-five percent (85%) of the sentence before being
not be eligible for parole consideration or any earned credits. The
terms of imprisonment specified in this subsection shall not be
subject to statutory provisions for suspension, deferral, or
probation, or state correctional institution earned credits accruing
from and after November 1, 1989, except for the achievement earned
credits authorized by subsection H of Section 138 of Title 57 of the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1260 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Okla homa Statutes. To qualify for such achievement earned credits,
such inmates must also be in compliance with the standards for Class
level 2 behavior, as defined in subsection D of Section 138 of Title
57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
D. It is an affirmative defense to prosecution for a criminal,
youthful offender, or delinquent offense that, during the time of
the alleged commission of the offense, the defendant or alleged
youthful offender or delinquent was a victim of human trafficking.
E. The consent of a victim to the activity prohibited by this
section shall not constitute a defense.
F. Lack of knowledge of the age of the victim shall not
constitute a defense to the activity prohibited by this section with
respect to human trafficking of a minor.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1031, as
last amended by Section 397, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1031), is amended to read as follows:
A. Except as provided in subsection B, C, D, or E of this
section, any person violating any of the provisions of paragraph 1,
2, 3, or 5 of subsection A of Section 1029 or Section 1030 of this
title shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall
be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than
thirty (30) days nor more than one (1) year or by fines as follows:
a fine not more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00)
upon the first conviction for violation of any of such provisions, a
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1260 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

fine not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) upon the second
conviction for violation of any of such provisions, and a fine not
more than Seven Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($7,500.00) upon the
third or subsequent convictions for violation of any of such
provisions, or by both such imprisonment and fine. In addition, the
court may require a term of community service not less than forty
(40) hours nor more than eighty (80) hours. The court in which any
such conviction is had shall notify the county superintendent of
public health of such conviction.
B. Any person who engages in an act of prostitution with
knowledge that he or she is infected with the human immunodeficiency
virus shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class D1 felony offense
punishable by imprisonment as provided for in subsections B through
F E of Section 20N of this title.
C. Any person who engages in an act of child prostitution sex
trafficking as defined in Section 1030 of this title shall, upon
conviction, be guilty of a Class B1 felony offense punishable by
imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for not
more than ten (10) years and by fines as follows: a fine not more
than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) upon the first conviction, a
fine not more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) upon the second
conviction, and a fine not more than Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00) upon the third or subsequent convictions. Any person

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1260 SFLR Page 11
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

conv icted pursuant to this subsection shall not be eligible for
parole consideration or any earned credits.
D. Any person violating any of the provisions of Section 1029
or 1030 of this title within one thousand (1,000) feet of a school
or church shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class D1 felony
offense and shall be punished by imprisonment as provided for in
subsections B through F E of Section 20N of this title, or by fines
as follows: a fine not more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars
($2,500.00) upon the first conviction for violation of any of such
provisions, a fine not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00)
upon the second conviction for violation of any of such provisions,
and a fine not more than Seven Thousand Five Hundred Dollars
($7,500.00) upon the third or subsequent convictions for violation
of any of such provisions, or by both such imprisonment and fine.
In addition, the court may require a term of community service not
less than forty (40) hours nor more than eighty (80) hours. The
court in which any such conviction is had shall notify the county
superintendent of public health of such conviction.
E. Any person violating paragraph 4 of subsection A of Section
1029 of this title shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class B4
felony offense and shall be punished in accordance with the
provisions of subsection B of Section 1040.57 of this title.


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1260 SFLR Page 12
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 4. REPEALER 21 O.S. 2021, Section 13.1, as
amended by Section 5, Chapter 59, O.S.L. 2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 13.1), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 5. REPEALER 21 O.S. 2021, Section 13.1, as last
amended by Section 2, Chapter 18, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 13.1), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 6. REPEALER 21 O.S. 2021, Section 13.1, as last
amended by Section 1, Chapter 352, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 13.1), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 7. REPEALER 21 O.S. 2021, Section 748, as last
amended by Section 2, Chapter 291, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 748), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 8. REPEALER 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1031, as last
amended by Section 5, Chapter 151, O.S.L. 2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 1031), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 9. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON PUBLIC SAFETY
February 10, 2026 - DO PASS







SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1260 SFLR Page 13
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)